Utah statutes.
75-5-410.   Who may be appointed conservator -- Priorities.
(1) The court may appoint an individual, or a corporation with general power
to serve as trustee, as conservator of the estate of a protected person.  The
following are entitled to consideration for appointment in the order listed:
(a)  a conservator, guardian of property, or other like fiduciary appointed or
recognized by the appropriate court of any other jurisdiction in which the
protected person resides;
(b)  an individual or corporation nominated by the protected person if he is
14 or more years of age and has, in the opinion of the court, sufficient
mental capacity to make an intelligent choice;
(c)  the court shall appoint a conservator in accordance with the protected
person's most recent nomination, unless the potential conservator is
disqualified or the court finds other good cause why that person should not
serve as conservator.  The nomination shall be in writing and shall be signed
by the person making the nomination.  The nomination shall be in substantially
the following form:
Nomination of Conservator
I, (Name), being of sound mind and not acting under duress, fraud, or other
undue influence, do hereby nominate (Name, current residence, and
relationship, if any, of the nominee) to serve as the conservator of my
property in the event that after the date of this instrument I become
incapacitated or have other need for protection.
Executed at __________________________________ (city, state)
on this ___________ day of _______________________________
______________________________
(Signature)
(d)  a person who has been nominated by the protected person, by any means
other than that described in Subsection (1)(c), if the protected person was 14
years of age or older when the nomination was executed and, in the opinion of
the court, that person acted with sufficient mental capacity to make the
nomination;
(e)  the spouse of the protected person;
(f)  an adult child of the protected person;
(g)  a parent of the protected person, or a person nominated by the will of a
deceased parent;
(h)  any relative of the protected person with whom he has resided for more
than six months prior to the filing of the petition;
(i)  a person nominated by the person who is caring for him or paying benefits
to him.
(2)  A person in the priorities described in Subsection (1)(a), (e), (f), (g),
or (h) may nominate in writing a person to serve in his stead.  With respect
to persons having equal priority, the court is to select the one who is best
qualified of those willing to serve.  The court, for good cause, may pass over
a person having priority and appoint a person having less priority or no
priority.
